Alabama, session 2026rs, HB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 1 of Act 80-356 (1980 Regular
Session, p. 835), as last amended by Act 2022-407 (2022
Regular Session), is amended to read as follows:
"Section 1. (a) Any law enforcement officer in the
service of Tuscaloosa County or any city located in the
county, or who is employed under a L.E.A.A. or L.E.P.A. grant,
and who is assigned to duty for more than eight hours during
any one day or for more than 40 hours during any calendar
week, shall be paid time and one-half for those excess hours
worked, or he or she shall be given time and one-half
compensatory leave. It shall be at the sole option of the law
enforcement officer affected by this subsection whether he or
she shall receive overtime pay or compensatory leave.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), upon adoption by
resolution of the city council of the City of Northport or the
City of Tuscaloosa, Alabama, that city may implement the
scheduling of four 10-hour shifts per week rather than five
8-hour shifts per week for certain positions in its police
department, and any affected law enforcement officer who is
assigned to duty for more than 10 hours during any one day or
for more than 40 hours during any calendar week shall be paid
Page 1

for more than 40 hours during any calendar week shall be paid
HB160 Enrolled
time and one-half for those excess hours worked, or he or she
shall be given time and one-half compensation leave. It shall
be at the sole option of the law enforcement officer whether
he or she shall receive overtime pay or compensatory leave.
This subsection shall apply only to those City of Northport or
City of Tuscaloosa law enforcement officers who are assigned
to four 10-hour shifts per week. All other City of Northport
or City of Tuscaloosa law enforcement officers assigned to
five 8-hour shifts shall remain under subsection (a).
(c) An individual employed as the City of Tuscaloosa's
Executive Director of Public Safety shall not be eligible for
any overtime pay or compensatory leave provided under this
section."
Section 2. Section 1 of Act 88-317 (1988 Regular
Session, p. 481) is amended to read as follows:
"Section 1. (a) Any full-time paid employee engaged in
"fire protection activities" in any municipality in Tuscaloosa
County shall receive overtime pay at a rate of time and
one-half the regular rate of pay or shall be given time and
one-half compensatory leave for hours worked in excess of 24
hours in a tour of duty or 53 hours in a calendar week.
(b)(1) Paid hours worked may be averaged according to
the United States Fair Labor Standards Act, as amended, and
the work week hours as used in this act shall decline in the
future to coincide with all succeeding United States
Department of Labor regulations.
(2) Such A municipality may institute a shorter work
week than the United States Department of Labor requires if
Page 2

week than the United States Department of Labor requires if
HB160 Enrolled
they so desire.
(c) Gross pay received for a normal work week or work
period at the passage of this bill, shall be gross pay or base
pay for a 53 hour 53-hour work week, and all succeeding raises
shall raise such the gross pay or base pay accordingly.
(d) All paid leave of absences shall be counted as
hours worked.
(e) And, it It shall be the sole option of the employee
as to whether he or she shall receive overtime pay or
compensatory leave.
(f) An individual employed as the City of Tuscaloosa's
Executive Director of Public Safety shall not be eligible to
any overtime pay or compensatory leave provided under this
section."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB160 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 22-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk


100
101
102
103 Senate 12-Feb-26 Passed
104
105
106
Page 4